Maine, session 132, LD268.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17-A MRSA §1613 is enacted to read:
§1613. Judicial discretion
1. Term of imprisonment under this Title. Beginning January 1, 2026,
notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the court shall exercise judicial
discretion in imposing a sentencing alternative that includes a term of imprisonment under
this Title. Beginning January 1, 2026, any provision of this Title that requires the court to
impose a mandatory term of imprisonment is deemed to require the court to exercise
judicial discretion and to determine and impose a sentence of imprisonment that may be
less than the length that is stated as mandatory.
2. Term of imprisonment under other Titles. Beginning January 1, 2026,
notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the court shall exercise judicial
discretion in imposing a sentence of a term of imprisonment under any provision of any
other Title. Beginning January 1, 2026, any provision of any other Title that requires the
court to impose a mandatory term of imprisonment is deemed to require the court to
exercise judicial discretion and to determine and impose a sentence of imprisonment that
may be less than the length that is stated as mandatory.
Sec. 2. Report and legislation. The Criminal Law Advisory Commission,
established pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 12004-I, subsection 52
and referred to in this section as "the commission," shall review the Maine Revised Statutes
and compile a list of all provisions that require a court of this State in sentencing a person
for a violation of law to impose a mandatory term of imprisonment. The commission shall
submit a report by December 3, 2025 to the Joint Standing Committee on Criminal Justice
and Public Safety listing all provisions of all Titles in the Maine Revised Statutes that
require the court to impose a mandatory term of imprisonment and providing proposed
language to change the mandatory term of imprisonment into a maximum term of
imprisonment as determined in the discretion of the court. After receiving and reviewing
the report of the commission, the Joint Standing Committee on Criminal Justice and Public
Safety may introduce legislation related to the report to the Second Regular Session of the
132nd Legislature.